District of Columbia statutes.
5-132.05

Authority to issue RFP’s for school security related contracts.

Responsibility for the issuance of a Request for Proposals for any security guard or security related contract for DCPS for a contract term to begin June 30, 2005, or later shall transfer to the MPD as of August 2, 2004. The responsibility for awarding, executing, and funding a contract resulting from an RFP issued under this section shall be the subject of a Memorandum of Agreement between DCPS and MPD.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-350, § 105, 52 DCR 2005

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 6 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-318, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4707).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Metropolitan Police Department School Safety and Security Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-496, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8797).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-596, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11219).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(a) of School Security Authority Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-728, January 13, 2005, 52 DCR 1954).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of School Safety and Security Contracting Procedures Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-3, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2675).